Utah statutes.
62A-11-326.1.   Enrollment of child in accident and health insurance plan --
Order -- Notice.
(1) The office may issue a notice to existing and future employers or unions
to enroll a dependent child in an accident and health insurance plan that is
available through the dependent child's parent or legal guardian's employer or
union, when the following conditions are satisfied:
(a)  the parent or legal guardian is already required to obtain insurance
coverage for the child by a prior court or administrative order; and
(b)  the parent or legal guardian has failed to provide written proof to the
office that:
(i)  the child has been enrolled in an accident and health insurance plan in
accordance with the court or administrative order; or
(ii)  the coverage required by the order was not available at group rates
through the employer or union 30 or more days prior to the date of the mailing
of the notice to enroll.
(2)  The office shall provide concurrent notice to the parent or legal
guardian in accordance with Section 62A-11-304.4 of:
(a)  the notice to enroll sent to the employer or union; and
(b)  the opportunity to contest the enrollment due to a mistake of fact by
filing a written request for an adjudicative proceeding with the office within
15 days of the notice being sent.
(3)  A notice to enroll shall result in the enrollment of the child in the
parent's accident and health insurance plan, unless the parent successfully
contests the notice based on a mistake of fact.
(4)  A notice to enroll issued under this section may be considered a
"qualified medical support order" for the purposes of enrolling a dependent
child in a group accident and health insurance plan as defined in Section
609(a), Federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
